Utah, session 2026, HB52.
Section 1. Section 53-3-237 is enacted to read:53-3-237Effective 01/01/27. Driver license notation of tribal membership.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Bureau of Indian Affairs affidavit of birth" or "tribal affidavit of birth" means an affidavit of birth issued by the United States Bureau of Indian Affairs that includes:(i)the individual's name;(ii)the individual's date of birth; and(iii)other identifying information.(b)"Enhanced tribal card" means a tribal identification card that:(i)is issued by a federally recognized Indian tribe;(ii)meets the requirements established by the United States Department of Homeland Security for use as an acceptable document to denote identity and citizenship; and(iii)includes enhanced security features.(c)"Federally recognized Indian tribe" means an Indian tribe recognized and included on the list required by 25 U.S.C. Sec. 5131.(d)"Tribal certificate of Indian blood" means a certificate issued by the United States Bureau of Indian Affairs that:(i)certifies the degree of Indian blood of an individual; and(ii)verifies the individual's enrollment or eligibility for enrollment in a federally recognized Indian tribe.(e)"Tribal identification card" means an identification card issued by a federally recognized Indian tribe that includes:(i)the individual's name;(ii)the individual's date of birth;(iii)a photograph of the individual; and(iv)the name of the issuing tribe.(2)An applicant may, as part of the application process described in Section 53-3-205 or 53-3-804, request a notation on the applicant's individual license certificate or identification card indicating that the individual is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe.(3)The division shall accept the following as satisfactory proof that the applicant is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe:(a)an enhanced tribal card;(b)a tribal identification card;(c)a tribal certificate of Indian blood; or(d)a tribal or Bureau of Indian Affairs affidavit of birth.(4)(a)If the applicant provides satisfactory proof as described in Subsection (3), the division shall include on the individual's license certificate or identification card a notation of "Federally Recognized Tribal Member."(b)The notation may not identify a specific Indian tribe or other specific personal information that is submitted on the documents that provide satisfactory proof that the person is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe.

Section 2:
Section 2.  FY 2026 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2026. Subsection 2(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.CRIMINAL JUSTICEDEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETYITEM 1Department of Public Safety - Driver LicenseFrom Department of Public Safety Restricted Account, One-time192,900Driver License Administration192,900The Legislature intends that Driver License Division spend the appropriation under Item 1 to update the driver license format to accommodate the notation described in Section 53-3-237.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect July 1, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 53-3-237 Effective 01/01/27 take effect on January 1, 2027.